District of Columbia statutes.
5-331.03

Policy on First Amendment assemblies.

It is the declared public policy of the District of Columbia that persons and groups have a right to organize and participate in peaceful First Amendment assemblies on the streets, sidewalks, and other public ways, and in the parks of the District of Columbia, and to engage in First Amendment assembly near the object of their protest so they may be seen and heard, subject to reasonable restrictions designed to protect public safety, persons, and property, and to accommodate the interest of persons not participating in the assemblies to use the streets, sidewalks, and other public ways to travel to their intended destinations, and use the parks for recreational purposes.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-352, § 103, 52 DCR 2296
This section is referenced in § 5-331.04 and § 5-331.07.